dev/translit/mar.twol
Alphabet
	A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
	a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
	अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ए ऐ ओ औ
	् ा ि ी ु ू े ै ो ौ ं ः
	क ख ग घ
	च छ ज झ
	त थ द ध न
	ट ठ ड ढ ण
	प फ ब भ म
	य र ऱ ल व श ष
	स ह ळ
	;
Sets
	
	Consonant = B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z
				b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z
				क ख ग घ
				च छ ज झ
				त थ द ध न
				ट ठ ड ढ ण
				प फ ब भ म
				य र ऱ ल व श ष
				स ह ळ क्ष ;

	Vowel	  = A E I O U
				a e i o u
				अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ए ऐ ओ औ
				ा ि ी ु ू े ै ो ौ ः ;

	FullVowel = अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ए ऐ ओ औ ;

	Nasal 	  = ं म न ;

	Breaker   = ् ;

	NonBreakable = य ह ;

	Rs = र ऱ ;

Rules

	"schwa suppression (add vowel before final breaker)"
	्:0 <=> [ [ Consonant Vowel* ] | FullVowel | Nasal ] [ Consonant - Rs ] _ [ Consonant - NonBreakable ] [ Breaker \र | \Breaker ?+ ] ; 
	except 
		ल _ ल | ळ ; 
		ळ _ ल | ळ ;
		क _ क | ख ;
		ख _ ख | क ;
		ग _ ग | घ ;
		घ _ घ | ग ;
		च _ च | छ ;
		छ _ च | छ ;
		ज _ ज | झ ;
		झ _ ज | झ ;
		त _ त | थ ;
		थ _ त | थ ;
		द _ द | ध ;
		ध _ द | ध ;
		ट _ ट | ठ ;
		ठ _ ठ | ट ;
		ड _ ड | ढ ;
		ढ _ ढ | ड ;
		प _ प | फ ;
		फ _ प | फ ;
		ब _ ब | भ ;
		भ _ ब | भ ;
		र _ र ;
		व _ व ;
		श _ श | ष ;
		ष _ श | ष ;
		स _ स ;
		ह _ ह ;

	"initial r"
	्:0 <=> [ [ Consonant Vowel* ] | FullVowel | Nasal ] Rs _ [ त | ल | ण ] [ Breaker \Rs | \Breaker ? .#. | Vowel .#. ] ; 

	"mb -> nasal"
	म:ं <=> _ Breaker: [ ब | भ | फ ];

	"n_ -> nasal"
	न:ं <=> _ Breaker: [Consonant - [ह | य] ] ;

	"remove breaker"
	Breaker:0 <=> :ं _ ;

	"remove double safety"
	Breaker:0 <=> Breaker _ ;
